New York, session 2025-2026, S4387.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph j of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the state 2 finance law, as amended by section 28 of part PP of chapter 56 of the 3 laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 j. "Best value" means the basis for awarding contracts for services to 5 the offerer which optimizes quality, cost and efficiency, among respon- 6 sive and responsible offerers. Such basis shall reflect, wherever possi- 7 ble, objective and quantifiable analysis. Such basis may also identify a 8 quantitative factor for offerers that are small businesses, certified 9 minority- or women-owned business enterprises as defined in subdivisions 10 one, seven, fifteen and twenty of section three hundred ten of the exec- 11 utive law or service-disabled veteran-owned business enterprises as 12 defined in subdivision one of section forty of the veterans' services 13 law to be used in evaluation of offers for awarding of contracts for 14 services. Such basis shall also identify as a quantitative factor 15 whether the commodities or services offered were manufactured by or will 16 be performed by members of a labor organization as defined in section 17 two hundred ninety-two of the executive law. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 19 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to paragraph j 20 of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the state finance law made by section 21 one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be 22 deemed to be repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04339-01-5